Hawaii statutes.
§667-4 Defenses. The mortgagor, or any
subsequent mortgagee, may defend the action for foreclosure, and may show any
matter in legal or equitable avoidance of the mortgage. [CC 1859, §1234; RL
1925, §2890; RL 1935, §4723; RL 1945, §12423; RL 1955, §336-4; HRS §667-4; am L
1972, c 90, §9(d)]

Rules of Court

Pleading under the Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, see HRCP
rules 7, 8, 10, 12. Affirmative defenses, see HRCP rule 8(c).

Case Notes

Acceleration provision in mortgage although not in note secured
is enforceable by foreclosure. 32 H. 420 (1932).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next